Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to  the State Department of Energy, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $4,334,048 for debt service for
the small scale local energy loan program.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$31,236,157 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Department
of Energy.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,023,370 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Department of  Energy for debt service for the energy
efficiency and sustainable technology loan  program and for the Public Schools Grant Pro-
gram.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,203,426 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the State Department of
Energy.
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the following  expenditures by the
State Department of Energy are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for loans for small scale local energy projects; and
(2) Expenditures for debt service.
SECTION 6.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5545 (SB 5545-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5545 (SB 5545-A) Page 2